Utah statutes.
26-26-6.   Revocation of authorization.

The department upon 15 days written notice and an opportunity to be heard, may revoke an institution's authorization if the institution has violated any provision of this chapter, or has failed to comply with the conditions required by the department in respect to the issuance of authorization.

